Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 60 Council on Elementary and Secondary Education
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-60-1.
Council on elementary and secondary education established.

There is created a council on elementary and secondary education which shall be and is constituted a public corporation, empowered to sue and be sued in its own name, to have a corporate seal, and to exercise all the powers, in addition to those specifically enumerated in this chapter, usually appertaining to public corporations entrusted with control of elementary and secondary education institutions and functions. The council on elementary and secondary education shall be protected from sudden changes in membership and reversal of policy by having staggered terms for its public members.

Upon its organization the council on elementary and secondary education shall be invested with the legal title (in trust for the state) to all property, real and personal, now owned by and/or under the control or in the custody of the board of regents for education for the use of the department of elementary and secondary education. The council on elementary and secondary education is made successor to all powers, rights, duties, and privileges pertaining to elementary and secondary education.

The council on elementary and secondary education is made successor to all powers, rights, duties, and privileges formerly belonging to the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, unless otherwise specified in law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 48, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 124, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 18; P.L. 2006, ch. 8, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 28, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 7.

16-60-2.
Appointment of board members.

The governor shall establish the council on elementary and secondary education by appointing eight (8) members of the board of education established pursuant to chapter 97 of this title to serve as members of the council until the expiration of their term and appointment of their successor as a member of the board of education. The chair of the board of education shall serve on the council in a voting, ex-officio capacity. Five (5) voting members of the council shall constitute a quorum and the vote of the majority of those present and voting shall be required for action. The governor shall appoint the chair of the council on an annual basis from among the eight (8) council members.

No person shall be eligible for appointment to the board after the effective date of this act [March 24, 2006] unless he or she is a resident of this state.

There is hereby established a student advisory council to the council on elementary and secondary education, consisting of one elected high school student representative from each public secondary school in the state of Rhode Island.

Each public secondary school shall hold elections for its representative to the student advisory council no earlier than the first (1st) day of March and no later than the end of the second (2nd) full week of April. Each school shall elect only one representative. Elected members shall be notified of their election on or before the Friday of the third (3rd) week of April of the year of their election. No person shall be eligible to be elected to the student advisory council unless at the time of his or her election he or she is enrolled as a student in a secondary school between the grades of nine (9) and eleven (11) within the state of Rhode Island. No person shall be allowed to vote if they are not currently enrolled in a Rhode Island public secondary school between the grades of nine (9) and eleven (11). If at any time during his or her term of office a member of the student advisory council ceases to be so enrolled, his or her membership shall be terminated and his or her position shall be deemed vacant. This vacancy shall be filled by the public secondary school within thirty (30) school days of the opening of the vacancy.

The student advisory council will serve from the first (1st) day of May of the year it is elected until the last day of April of the following year. A student may serve no more than three (3) terms.

Said student advisory council shall meet from time to time and shall consider such matters as it deems appropriate.

Prior to the first (1st) day of June of each annual session the student advisory council shall adopt a set of bylaws.

Members of the council shall not be compensated for service in attending meetings except that they shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in travelling to and from meetings.

The members of said student advisory council shall, by majority vote prior to the first (1st) day of June in each year, elect from their members a chairperson who shall serve for a term of one year beginning on the first (1st) day of June. Said chairperson shall serve as an ex officio and nonvoting member of the council for a term of one year, unless the student advisory council removes said chairperson from his or her position in a manner described within the bylaws of that council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 227, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 533, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 55; P.L. 2006, ch. 8, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 28, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 7.

16-60-3.
Removal of public members of board.

Public members of the board of regents shall be removable by the governor for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful. No removal shall be made for any cause except after ten (10) days’ notice in writing of specific charges, with opportunity for the member to be present in person and with counsel at a public hearing before the governor, to introduce witnesses and documentary evidence in the member’s own defense, and to confront and cross-examine adversary witnesses; and appeal shall lie to the superior court from the governor’s determination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3.

16-60-4.
Council on elementary and secondary education — Powers and duties.

The council on elementary and secondary education shall have in addition to those enumerated in §

16-60-1

, the following powers and duties:

To approve a systematic program of information gathering, processing, and analysis addressed to every aspect of elementary and secondary education in this state especially as that information relates to current and future educational needs so that current needs may be met with reasonable promptness and plans formulated to meet future needs as they arise in the most efficient and economical manner possible;

To approve a master plan implementing the broad goals and objectives for elementary and secondary education in the state that have been established by the board of education. These goals and objectives shall be expressed in terms of what men and women should know and be able to do as a result of their educational experience. The council on elementary and secondary education shall continually evaluate the efforts and results of education in the light of these objectives;

To adopt standards and require enforcement and to exercise general supervision over all elementary and secondary public and nonpublic education in the state as provided in subsection (a)(8) of this section. The council on elementary and secondary education shall not engage in the operation or administration of any subordinate committee, local school district, school, school service, or school program, except its own department of elementary and secondary education, and except as specifically authorized by an act of the general assembly. The adoption and submittal of the budget and the allocation of appropriations, the acquisition, holding, disposition, and general management of property shall not be construed to come within the purview of the preceding prohibition. The council on elementary and secondary education shall communicate with, and seek the advice of, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and all those concerned with and affected by its determinations as a regular procedure in arriving at its conclusions and in setting its policy;

To allocate and coordinate the various educational functions among the educational agencies of the state and local school districts and to promote cooperation among them so that maximum efficiency and economy shall be achieved;

To prepare, with the assistance of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, and to present annually to the state budget officer, in accordance with §

35-3-4

, a total educational budget for the elementary and secondary sector that shall include, but not be limited to, the budgets of the department of elementary and secondary education, subordinate boards and agencies, and state aid to local school districts. Prior to submitting the budget as required by the budget office instructions and this subsection, the council shall present the budget to the board of education for review and approval; and

In the preparation of the budget, the council on elementary and secondary education shall implement the priorities established by the board of education of expenditures for elementary and secondary education purposes of state revenues and other public resources made available for the support of public elementary and secondary education among the various education agencies of the state. Nothing contained in this section shall authorize any individual or group of individuals to reallocate resources in a manner other than that prescribed in the budget as appropriations by the general assembly.

To maintain a department of elementary and secondary education, to provide for its staffing and organization, and to appoint a commissioner of elementary and secondary education pursuant to §

16-60-6

who shall serve at its pleasure. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education and the department of elementary and secondary education shall have any duties and responsibilities as defined in §§

16-60-6

and

16-60-7

;

To establish other educational agencies or subcommittees necessary or desirable for the conduct of any or all aspects of elementary and secondary education and to determine all powers, functions, and composition of any agencies or subcommittees and to dissolve them when their purpose shall have been fulfilled; provided that nothing contained in this subdivision shall be construed to grant the council the power to establish subcommittees or agencies performing the duties and functions of local school committees except as provided in §

16-1-10

;

To exercise the authority previously vested in the board of regents for education with relation to secondary nonpublic educational institutions within the state under the terms of chapter 40 of this title and other laws affecting nonpublic education in the state, and to cause the department of elementary and secondary education to administer the provisions of that section;

To exercise all the functions, powers and duties that previously were vested in the board of regents for education, under the provisions of former § 16-49-4(9), including but not limited to the following specific functions:

To approve the basic subjects and courses of study to be taught and instructional standards required to be maintained in the public elementary and secondary schools of the state;

To adopt standards and qualifications for the certification of teachers and to provide for the issuance of certificates, and to establish fees for the certification of teachers. The fees collected for the certification of teachers, along with various education licensing and testing fees, shall be deposited by the council on elementary and secondary education as general revenues. The funds appropriated by the general assembly shall be utilized by the department of elementary and secondary education to establish and support programs that enhance the quality and diversity of the teaching profession. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall regularly make recommendations to the board about specific programs and projects to be supported by those funds. The commissioner shall oversee the funds, assess the effectiveness of its programs and projects, and make recommendations about the general use and operation of the funds to the board;

To be responsible for the distribution of state school funds;

To determine the necessity of school construction and to approve standards for design and construction of school buildings throughout the state;

To set standards for school libraries and school library services;

To make recommendations relative to transportation of pupils to school, school bus routes, time schedules, and other matters relating to pupil transportation;

To enforce the provisions of all laws relating to elementary and secondary education;

To decide and determine appeals from decisions of the commissioner;

To prescribe forms for the use of local school committees and local officers when reporting to the department of elementary and secondary education;

To adopt and require standard accounting procedures for local school districts, except as provided for in subdivision (3) of §

16-24-2

; and

To adopt and require standard uniform operating and capital budgeting procedures for local school districts.

To establish rules for the approval and accrediting of elementary and secondary schools;

To recommend to the general assembly changes in the size and number of the school districts within the state; and to make any further and other recommendations to the general assembly as the council on elementary and secondary education may determine to be necessary or desirable, including, but not limited to, proposals for incentives for the coordination of services and facilities of certain school districts and the feasibility of granting taxing authority to local school committees upon their request, and the impact upon the quality of education within that particular community by granting the request. In carrying out this duty, the council on elementary and secondary education shall periodically issue reports in school district organizations for selected regions and school districts;

To exercise all other powers with relation to the field of elementary and secondary education within this state not specifically granted to any other department, board, or agency, and not incompatible with law, which the council on elementary and secondary education may deem advisable;

To exercise the authority previously vested in the board of regents for education with relation to adult education as defined in §

16-58-2

[repealed] and to establish definitive goals for and operate a comprehensive delivery system for adult education programs and services, including the counseling and testing of persons interested in obtaining high school equivalency diplomas, the issuance of diplomas, and the maintenance of a permanent record of applications, tests, and equivalency diplomas;

To promote maximum efficiency and economy in the delivery of elementary and secondary educational services in the state;

To approve a training program for school committee members to enhance their individual skills and their effectiveness as a corporate body. The training program should include, but not be limited to, the following roles and responsibilities of school committees: strategic planning, human and community relations, and school finance and budgeting;

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the board shall submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the council; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this subsection;

To prepare with the assistance of the commissioner a multi-year plan of priority educational goals and objectives. This plan should recommend policy objectives, implementation strategies, and a timetable for major policy initiatives;

Each year the governor shall by writing notify the council on elementary and secondary education concerning broad economic, cultural, and social needs that the education system needs to consider which the council shall address in developing educational plans and programs;

Appoint a standing committee that will develop a schedule to systematically review all council policies over a three-year (3) period;

To prepare, with the assistance of the commissioner, a statement of regulatory policy. This policy should set forth the goals and objectives of state regulations which are expressed in terms of what educational inputs and outputs the board expects regulations to address;

To prepare, with the assistance of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, and to present annually to the general assembly by January 1 a report on school discipline in Rhode Island schools. This report shall include:

Expulsions by district, including duration and the reason for each action;

Suspensions by district, including duration and the reason for each action;

Placements to alternative programs for disciplinary reasons;

Assaults of teachers, students, and school staff by students;

Incidents involving possession of weapons on school property. For the purpose of this section, a weapon shall be considered any of those weapons described in §§

11-47-2

and

11-47-42

;

Incidents of the sale of controlled substances by students;

Incidents of the possession with the intent to sell controlled substances by students;

Additional demographic information including, but not limited to, the ethnic and racial classifications, age, and gender, as prescribed by the commissioner, of each of the students involved in the incidents, events or actions described in subparagraphs (A) through (G) of this subdivision; and

A description of the education program provided to each student suspended for over ten (10) consecutive school days in a school year.

All school superintendents shall supply the necessary information on forms established by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education to the council on elementary and secondary education to assist in the preparation of the council’s report on school discipline.

To prepare and promulgate a uniform statewide school reporting system which would provide information including, but not limited to, the following:

Student and teacher attendance rates;

Standardized test scores;

Demographic profiles;

Results of polls of students, parents, and teachers;

Descriptions of goals, initiatives, and achievements;

Best teaching practices;

Alternative student assessments;

Special programs; and

Number of student suspensions and teacher grievances and the amount of parental involvement.

[Deleted by P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 7].

The council shall identify the benefit to students regarding the action that is taken in executing its duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 642, § 3; P.L. 1993, ch. 393, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 47; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 22, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 23; P.L. 1999, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 8, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 28, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 7; P.L. 2017, ch. 275, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 292, § 2.

16-60-4.1.
Granting of high school diplomas for World War II and Korean War veterans.

The board of regents shall have in addition to all the powers enumerated in §

16-60-1

and §

16-60-4

the authority to develop guidelines for issuing high school diplomas for World War II and Korean War veterans who left school early to fight in World War II or the Korean War. The board of regents shall develop and make available an application and a model diploma. The high school diploma shall be available to all veterans who left school in any grade to fight in World War II or the Korean War.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 230, § 1.

16-60-5.
Meetings of board.

The regents shall hold regular meetings at least twice in each quarter of each calendar year. All meetings of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall be open to the public, provided that executive sessions may be held as subordinate parts of public meetings. Every February at a time and place to be determined by the regents, the regents shall hold a meeting to which it shall invite the entire membership of the general assembly. At least thirty (30) days’ written notice of the annual meeting shall be furnished to each invitee, which notice shall include an agenda of the meeting, which agenda shall include but not be limited to the budget submitted for the fiscal year beginning July 1 of the next fiscal period.

In addition to other meetings, the regents shall hold at least one regular public meeting annually with representatives of the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns, the Rhode Island Association of School Committees, the Rhode Island School Superintendent’s Association, the Rhode Island Principal’s Association, the National Education Association of Rhode Island and the Rhode Island Federation of Teachers, for the purposes of obtaining their recommendations and comments regarding education policy and programs, and securing information from representatives of these organizations concerning the effectiveness of educational programs and policies, and considering any other mutually agreeable subjects.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 642, § 3.

16-60-6.
Commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

The council on elementary and secondary education, with the advice and consent of the board of education, shall appoint a commissioner of elementary and secondary education who shall serve at the pleasure of the council on elementary and secondary education, provided that the commissioner’s initial engagement by the council shall be for a period of not more than three (3) years. The position of commissioner shall be in the unclassified service of the state and he or she shall serve as the chief executive officer of the council on elementary and secondary education and as the chief administrative officer of the department of elementary and secondary education. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall have the duties that are defined in this section and in this title and any other additional duties that may be determined by the council on elementary and secondary education, and shall perform any other duties that may be vested in the commissioner by law. In addition to the general supervision of the department of elementary and secondary education and the appointment of the several officers and employees of the department, it shall be the duty of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education:

To develop and implement a systematic program of information gathering, processing, and analysis addressed to every aspect of elementary and secondary education in the state, especially as that information relates to current and future educational needs.

To prepare a master plan for elementary and secondary education in the state; to coordinate the goals and objectives of the public elementary and secondary education sector with the activities of the nonpublic elementary and secondary education sector where feasible.

To communicate with and seek the advice of those concerned with and affected by the board of education’s and the council’s determinations.

To implement broad policy as it pertains to the goals and objectives established by the board of education; to enforce standards and to exercise general supervision over public elementary and secondary education in the state and over all elementary and secondary nonpublic education in the state as provided in subsection (8) of this section; to assist in the preparation of the budget for elementary and secondary education and to be responsible upon direction of the council on elementary and secondary education for the allocation of appropriations, the acquisition, holding, disposition, and general management of property.

To be responsible for the coordination of the various elementary and secondary educational functions among the educational agencies of the state, including local school districts, and to encourage and to assist in the cooperation among them so that maximum efficiency and economy may be achieved.

To assist the council on elementary and secondary education in the preparation and presentation annually to the state budget officer, in accordance with §

35-3-4

, of a total state elementary and secondary educational budget that shall include, but not be limited to, the budget of the department of elementary and secondary education, subcommittees and agencies, and state aid to local school districts.

To supervise the operation of the department of elementary and secondary education; to have the duties as defined in §

16-1-5

and in this title or in law wherever outlined; and other additional duties and responsibilities that may be assigned by the council on elementary and secondary education.

To perform the duties vested in the board of education and council on elementary and secondary education with relation to nonpublic elementary and secondary educational institutions within the state under the terms of chapter 40 of this title, and other laws that affect nonpublic elementary and secondary education in the state.

To supervise the following specific functions:

To recommend the basic subjects and courses of study to be taught and instructional standards to be maintained in the public elementary and secondary schools in the state.

To recommend standards and qualifications of teachers and to issue certificates upon approval of standards and qualifications by the council on elementary and secondary education.

To distribute state school funds in accordance with law and regulations of the council on elementary and secondary education.

To certify as to the necessity of school construction and that standards and design are in accordance with law and regulations of the council on elementary and secondary education and to approve a design for school construction throughout the state.

To certify that school library standards and services are in accordance with law and regulations of the council on elementary and secondary education.

To recommend to the council on elementary and secondary education relating to the transportation of pupils to school.

To require the observance of all laws relating to elementary and secondary schools and education.

To interpret school law and to decide any controversies that may be appealed to him or her from decisions of local school committees.

To prepare and recommend standard forms for the use of local schools when reporting to the department of elementary and secondary education.

To prepare standard accounting and auditing procedures for local school districts, except for the purposes of §

16-24-2(3)

which shall be done in conjunction with the auditor general.

To prepare uniform budgeting procedures for local school districts.

To determine when special purpose grants made to local school districts shall be eligible for reimbursement through the school operations aid formula in accordance with chapter 7 of this title, and to designate the purpose(s) for which the local school district may use the school operations aid reimbursement, including reimbursement on local matching funds used to support the special purpose grant. The commissioner shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations to carry out the intent of this subsection.

To approve and accredit elementary and secondary schools in accordance with the policy and regulations of the council on elementary and secondary education.

To be responsible for the administration of policies, rules, and regulations of the board of education and the council on elementary and secondary education with relation to the entire field of elementary and secondary education within the state not specifically granted to any other department, board, or agency and not incompatible with law.

To receive from law enforcement agencies a list periodically of the names of Rhode Island missing children and to disseminate these lists to local school districts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 584, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 483, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 7; P.L. 2019, ch. 224, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 259, § 5.

16-60-7.
Department of elementary and secondary education — Personnel board.

The board of regents shall maintain a department of elementary and secondary education which shall perform the research, administrative, and instructional functions and duties, including technical assistance and statewide educational information services for local school districts, required of the regents by the provisions of this chapter. Within that department the appointment, promotion, salaries, term of service, and dismissal of all professional employees, including instructional and research employees, administrative employees, and secretaries shall be at the pleasure of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education except that the regents shall approve all assistant commissioners; all professional employees, including instructional and research employees, and administrative employees may be initially engaged under contract for not more than two (2) years. All professional employees, including instructional and research employees, and administrative employees shall not be in the classified service of the state nor be subject in any manner of control by the personnel administrator or by any officer or board other than the commissioner of elementary and secondary education; provided, that all permanent appointments of the commissioner to vacant, reestablish or newly established positions shall be subject to approval by the Emergency Hiring Council established by Executive Order 95-2. All appointments to positions at state operated schools shall be exempt from the preceding requirement provided that total full time equivalent positions are within the authorized cap and all these personnel are assigned exclusively to the schools. The hiring of individuals on a contract basis shall be subject to state purchasing requirements. All non-classified employees of the board of regents who shall have twenty (20) years, not necessarily consecutive, of service credit, these credits having been earned in either the classified, non-classified, or unclassified service or any combination of these, shall be deemed to have acquired full status in their positions as the status is defined by §

36-4-59

; provided, that this provision shall not apply to those employees whose base entry date is after August 7, 1996; and provided that this provision shall not apply to faculty employed by the board of regents nor shall it apply to non-classified employees who have acquired tenure as faculty. Employees who had permanent status prior to May 7, 1981, shall continue to retain their status. Persons employed by the department on February 1, 1974 in either the classified or unclassified service and who were receiving longevity payments on or before February 1, 1974 shall continue to be eligible for longevity benefits upon transfer to the non-classified service within the department.

The table of organization, as submitted by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, together with the pay ranges, shall be subject to approval by the board of regents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 530 § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 22, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 326, § 2.

16-60-7.1.
Early childhood training and resource center — Board of advisors.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall establish, maintain, and operate, in accordance with the guidelines of the board of advisors created pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, a training and resource center to serve as a source of information regarding training and resources for early childhood and child care professionals which would:

Provide information regarding requirements and/or sources for licensure, approval, and certification;

Provide information regarding sources of training to meet specific needs;

Maintain contact with professional organizations, state departments, higher education institutions, and other resources for training;

Develop a newsletter for dissemination of vital information regarding topics as department of health alerts, changes in department of human services programs, and eligibility criteria for persons seeking child care;

Develop and conduct training for which no identified training source currently exists;

Develop a speakers’ bureau;

Maintain a calendar of events for early childhood/child care professionals; and

Provide any other services that the board of advisors shall deem necessary.

To guide the department in the establishment, location, maintenance, and operation of the training and resource center, the department shall establish a board of advisors consisting of representatives from each of the following agencies, departments, professional associations, and educational institutions: department of children, youth, and families; department of human services; department of elementary and secondary education; department of health; Rhode Island Association for the Education of Young children; Rhode Island Early Childhood Resource Center; Rhode Island Association for Home Day Care; Rhode Island Day Care Director’s Association; Association for Childhood Education, Providence area; Rhode Island Head Start Director’s Association; Community College of Rhode Island; Rhode Island College; the University of Rhode Island; and any other agencies, departments, institutions, and associations as the advisory board shall prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 364, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 509, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 13.

16-60-7.2.
Longevity payments — Nonclassified employees.

The non-classified employees of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, except for non-classified employees already receiving longevity increases, shall be entitled to a longevity payment in the amount of five percent (5%) of base salary after ten (10) years of service and increasing to a total of ten percent (10%) of base salary after twenty (20) years of service. The provisions of this section shall apply only to employees under the grade of nineteen (19). The longevity payments shall not be included in base salary.

The board of regents is authorized to promulgate regulations implementing the provisions of this section.

Beginning on July 1, 2011, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the public laws or general laws to the contrary, there shall be no further longevity increases for employees of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education; provided, however, for employees with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, longevity increases shall cease beginning on July 1, 2011 or beginning upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later. To the extent an employee has previously accrued longevity payments, the amount of the longevity payment earned by the employee for the last pay period in June, 2011 shall be added to the employee’s base salary as of June 30, 2011, or in the case of an employee with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, the amount of the longevity payment earned by the employee for the latter of the last pay period in June or the last pay period prior to the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement shall be added to the employee’s base salary as of June 30, 2011 or upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 571, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 55; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 8, § 3.

16-60-7.3.
Statewide purchasing system and programs.

The department of elementary and secondary education, together with the department of administration, is authorized to develop and implement a voluntary statewide purchasing system for all public schools in this state, including regional school districts. Said system may be utilized for the purchase of all goods, supplies and services to support and enhance public school operations under a statewide contract, and shall include, but not be limited to, the following goods, supplies and services:

General school supplies such as paper goods, office supplies, textbooks and cleaning products that are or may be utilized by school departments;

Telecommunications, wireless services, computer equipment, hardware and software that have been identified by local school departments as needed to support curriculum objectives;

General non-medical and dental insurance products and services; provided however, that the statewide purchasing system shall permit districts to establish their own benefit and coverage levels.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or public law to the contrary, including the provisions of chapter 2 of title 37, the department of elementary and secondary education and local and regional school districts are authorized to participate in purchasing collaboratives, consisting of two (2) or more states. Said participation shall be subject to prior approval of the chief purchasing officer and rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 13, § 5.

16-60-8.
State educational budget and appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums as it deems necessary for support and maintenance of elementary and secondary education in the state and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of those appropriations or so much of this sum as may be necessary for the purposes appropriated, upon the receipt by the controller of proper vouchers as the board of regents for elementary and secondary education may by rule provide. The regents shall receive, review, and adjust the budget of its several subordinate committees and agencies and present the budget as part of the budget for elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 22, § 4.